Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6328
Governmental body; acceptance of bid; limitation.

No state agency, county, city, village, school district, or other political subdivision shall accept a bid in connection with any abatement project from a firm which does not hold a license from the department at the time the bid is submitted.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 176;

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 49;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1279.